California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(C) An authorized decoupling mechanism shall not enable the water corporation to earn a revenue windfall by encouraging higher sales.

(D) The water corporation may only submit an application to the commission pursuant to this paragraph as part of
 its triennial general rate case application described in Section 455.2, unless the commission and the water corporation mutually agree for the application to be otherwise submitted.

(e) In establishing rates for recovery of the costs of used and useful water plant, the commission may use a capital structure and payback methodology that maintains the reliability of water service, minimizes the long-term cost to ratepayers, provides equity between present and future ratepayers, and affords the utility an opportunity to earn a reasonable return on its used and useful investment, attract capital for investment on reasonable terms, and ensure the financial integrity of the utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 890, Sec. 2.   (SB 1469)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

728.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing, finds that the rates or classifications, demanded, observed, charged, or collected by any public utility for or in connection with any service, product, or commodity, or the rules, practices, or contracts affecting such rates or classifications are insufficient, unlawful, unjust, unreasonable, discriminatory, or preferential, the commission shall determine and fix, by order, the just, reasonable, or sufficient rates, classifications, rules, practices, or contracts to be thereafter observed and in force.

In determining and fixing rates for a telephone corporation pursuant to this section or
 pursuant to Section 455, or in determining whether or not a proposed rate increase is justified pursuant to Section 454, the commission shall, among other things, take into consideration any evidence offered concerning the quality of the particular telephone corporation’s services as compared with that of telephone corporations in adjacent territory, and the permissible rates for comparable service charged by telephone corporations in adjacent territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1948.)
-------------------------------------------

728.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, “plant held for future use account” means account number 105 of the Uniform System of Accounts Prescribed for Public Utilities and Licensees, as adopted by the commission.

(b) The commission shall review the status of all property owned by a gas or electrical corporation and held within the plant held for future use account at least once every three years or during a proceeding conducted pursuant to Section 728, for the purpose of determining and fixing the rates of that gas or electrical corporation, as determined by the commission.

(c) If a gas or electrical corporation sells property which was carried within the plant held for future use account and which was included in determining the rates of the corporation, the commission shall determine what portion of any gains from the sale shall be allocated to the customers of the corporation in a manner consistent with the procedures specified in account number 105 of the Uniform System of Accounts Prescribed for Public Utilities and Licensees. The portion of the gains allocated to customers shall not be less than the amount the corporation has recovered through rates for the carrying costs and other expenses of the property during the period it was carried in the plant held for future use, and shall not exceed the gain on the sale, net of any tax, resulting from the sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1204, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

728.2.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the commission shall have no jurisdiction or control over classified telephone directories or commercial advertising included as part of the corporation’s alphabetical telephone directories, including the charges for and the form and content of such advertising, except that the commission shall investigate and consider revenues and expenses with regard to the acceptance and publication of such advertising for purposes of establishing rates for other services offered by telephone corporations.

(b) If the
 commission determines, after a hearing, that any federal action would impair its ability to investigate and consider revenues and expenses with regard to the acceptance and publication of telephone directory advertising for the purpose of establishing rates for other services offered by any telephone corporation, the commission shall have the jurisdiction to regulate commercial advertising in alphabetical and classified directories of telephone corporations, except as provided in this subdivision.

(1) The commission’s jurisdiction to regulate commercial advertising in alphabetical and classified directories of telephone corporations under this subdivision shall be limited to the rates and charges for commercial directory advertising, except that the commission shall investigate and consider revenues and expenses of telephone corporations related to that advertising for purposes of establishing rates for other services offered by telephone
 corporations.

(2) The commission shall also have no jurisdiction over the following:

(i) The form and content of the advertising in alphabetical and classified directories of telephone corporations.

(ii) The form and content of the directories in which that advertising appears.

(iii) Directory advertising practices.

(iv) The determination of the geographic areas served by those directories.

(v) Complaints by any corporation or person regarding directory advertising. 

(3) The commission, by its own motion or on petition of any telephone corporation, may, after a
 hearing, issue an order relinquishing the jurisdiction assumed under this subdivision, except its jurisdiction to investigate and consider the revenues and expenses specified in paragraph (1) if the commission determines that relinquishing the jurisdiction will not affect its ability to investigate and consider those revenues and expenses. As used in this subdivision, “federal action” means the introduction of a bill in Congress, an order of the Federal Communications Commission, or an order or decision of any federal court which would prohibit state regulatory agencies which have no jurisdiction over directory advertising from considering revenues from this source for ratemaking purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1175, Sec. 1.   Effective September 20, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

728.3.

(a) No telephone corporation operating within a service area shall remove any public telephone unless it has posted on the public telephone for not less than 30 days a notice, in a manner and form approved by the commission, indicating that the public telephone is to be removed and containing the appropriate telephone number of the commission which a customer may call for further information.

(b) This section shall not apply when a public telephone is removed for public safety or public nuisance purposes or at the request of the owner or lessee of the property on which the
 public telephone is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1172, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

728.4.

A telephone corporation shall list a telephone number as the number for a facsimile machine in its alphabetical or classified directory only if requested to do so by the subscriber.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 973, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

728.5.

(a) The commission may establish rates or charges for the transportation of passengers and freight by railroads and other transportation companies, except motor carriers of property, and no railroad or other transportation company under its jurisdiction, except motor carriers of property, shall charge or demand or collect or receive a greater or less or different compensation for that transportation of passengers or freight, or for any service in connection therewith, between the points named in any tariff of rates established by the
 commission than the rates, fares and charges which are specified in that tariff. The commission may examine books, records and papers of all railroad and other transportation companies, except motor carriers of property; may hear and determine complaints against railroad and other transportation companies; and may issue subpoenas and all necessary process and send for persons and papers. The commission and each of the commissioners may administer oaths, take testimony and punish for contempt in the same manner and to the same extent as courts of record. The commission may prescribe a uniform system of accounts to be kept by all railroad and other transportation companies, except motor carriers of property.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

728.7.

(a) Prior to authorizing any change in the amount of the payment required of a telephone corporation which provides service between service areas to a telephone corporation which provides service within a service area for the use of its telephone lines, and prior to assigning to subscribers of a telephone corporation operating within a service area any charge, surcharge, or rate increase that is a result of a decrease in the amount of that payment, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Require the telephone corporation requesting authorization to increase
 subscriber rates or to impose a charge or surcharge on subscribers as a result of a change in the payments, to notify its subscribers, whenever the commission commences a proceeding on its own motion or in response to a petition to authorize a change in the amount of those payments or to impose that charge, surcharge, or rate increase as a result of a change in the amount of those payments.

(2) Require the telephone corporation to provide its subscribers with an exact description of, and explanation for, the change in the amount of the payment or the imposition of a charge, surcharge, or rate increase, within 90 days of the authorized change in the amount of payment or charge, surcharge, or rate increase. The description and explanation shall include a reasonably accurate quantitative assessment of the results of, and the reasons for, the change in the amount of payment or imposition of a charge, surcharge, or rate increase for each class of
 subscriber.

(b) The commission shall provide the Legislature with the information required of a telephone corporation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), for any change in payments, or imposition of a charge, surcharge, or rate increase as a result of a change in payment, made prior to January 1, 1987, within 60 days after that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1047, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

729.

The commission may, upon a hearing, investigate a single rate, classification, rule, contract, or practice, or any number thereof, or the entire schedule or schedules of rates, classifications, rules, contracts, and practices, or any thereof, of any public utility, and may establish new rates, classifications, rules, contracts, or practices or schedule or schedules in lieu thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

729.5.

A public utility, other than one-way radio paging services, shall not change a group of customers from one rate schedule to another rate schedule, if the change would result in an increase of more than 10 percent in the rate charged to the affected customers, without first notifying customers of the change. Upon the request of an affected customer, the commission may hold a hearing on the change.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

730.

(a) The commission shall, upon a hearing, determine the kind and character of facilities and the extent of the operation thereof, necessary reasonably and adequately to meet public requirements for service furnished by common carriers between any two or more points, and shall fix and determine the just, reasonable, and sufficient rates for such service. Whenever two or more common carriers are furnishing service in competition with each other, the commission may, after hearing, when necessary for the preservation of adequate service and when
 public interest demands, prescribe uniform rates, classifications, rules, and practices to be charged, collected, and observed by all such common carriers.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

730.3.

The commission shall notify every state and local public agency and corporation operating a passenger transit system making a written request for such notification before approving any rate increase for the passenger transportation services of any railroad or passenger state corporation within the territory served by such public transit system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1031, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

730.7.

In determining reimbursement to railroad corporations for the operation of rail passenger service, the commission shall not exceed that compensation which would be payable if calculated pursuant to the standards of the Rail Services Planning Office of the Interstate Commerce Commission contained in Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, Part 1127.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 732, Sec. 5.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

730.8.

Whenever a state agency files with the commission an application for an increase in rates or fares or for any change in the level of service for passenger transportation by a railroad corporation and the state agency has prior to the application held a public hearing on the matter which the commission finds to be complete and adequate, the commission may determine not to hold any further hearing on the matter and in this event shall approve, modify and approve as so modified, or disapprove the application within 90 days of the date of filing with the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 732, Sec. 6.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

731.

(a) (1) On or before June 30, 2024, the commission, in coordination and consultation with the Department of Community Services and Development and other relevant state agencies that provide low-income electric or gas utility customer assistance programs, shall develop a process that, to the extent
 possible, enables customers to concurrently apply, or begin to apply, to multiple low-income customer assistance programs using data collected during the original application process, including, but not limited to, all of the following programs:

(A) The California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) program described in Section 739.1.

(B) The Family Electric Rate Assistance program described in Section 739.12.

(C) The Energy Savings Assistance program described in Section 2790.

(2) The process developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be known as the concurrent application process.

(b) The commission shall work with state agencies, electrical corporations, and gas corporations to notify, to the extent possible, eligible individuals that they have been successfully enrolled or are in the process of being enrolled into other programs.

(c) The concurrent application process shall complement, rather than replace, other application processes.

(d) Before sharing data, an electrical corporation or gas corporation shall receive consent from its low-income applicants to use already-obtained application information to begin the enrollment process for other low-income electric or gas utility customer assistance programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 840, Sec. 2.   (SB 1208)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

(a) Whenever the commission, after a hearing finds that the rates, fares, or charges in force over two or more common carriers, between any two points in this state, are unjust, unreasonable, or excessive, or that no satisfactory through route or joint rate, fare, or charge exists between such points, and that the public convenience and necessity demand the establishment of such a through route and joint rate, fare, or charge, the commission may order such common carriers to establish such through route and may establish and fix a joint rate,
 fare, or charge which will be fair, just, reasonable, and sufficient, to be charged and collected in the future, and the terms and conditions under which such through route shall be operated. The commission may order that freight moving between such points shall be carried by the common carriers participating in such through route and joint rate, without being transferred from the originating cars.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

(a) If the common carriers do not agree upon the division between them of the joint rates, fares, or charges established by the commission over through routes, the commission shall, after hearing, by supplemental order, establish that division. Where any railroad, or passenger stage corporation that is made a party to a through route has itself over its own line an equally satisfactory through route between the termini of the through route established, that railroad, or passenger stage corporation may require as its division of the joint rate,
 fare, or charge its local rate, fare, or charge over the portion of its line comprised in the through route, and the commission may, in its discretion, allow to that railroad or passenger stage corporation, more than its local rate, fare, or charge if the commission determines that it will be equitable so to do. The commission may establish and fix through routes and joint rates, fares, or charges over common carriers and stage or auto stage lines which may not be otherwise subject to the provisions of this part, and may fix the division of those joint rates, fares, or charges.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to network railroad transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

734.

When complaint has been made to the commission concerning a rate for a product or commodity furnished or service performed by a public utility, and the commission has found, after investigation, that the public utility has charged an unreasonable, excessive, or discriminatory amount therefor in violation of any of the provisions of this part, the commission may order that the public utility make due reparation to the complainant
 therefor, with interest from the date of collection if no discrimination will result from that reparation. No order for the payment of reparation upon the ground of unreasonableness shall be made by the commission when the rate in question has, by formal finding, been declared by the commission to be reasonable, and no assignment of a reparation claim shall be recognized by the commission except assignments by operation of law as in cases of death, lack of legal capacity to make decisions, bankruptcy, receivership, or order of court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 51.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

735.

If the public utility does not comply with the order for the payment of reparation within the time specified in the order, suit may be instituted in any court of competent jurisdiction to recover the payment within one year from the date of the order, and not after. All complaints for damages resulting from a violation of any of the provisions of this part, except Sections 494 and 532, shall either be filed with the commission, or where concurrent jurisdiction of the cause of action is vested by the Constitution and laws of this State in the courts, in any court of competent jurisdiction, within two years from the time the cause of action accrues, and not
 after.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 702.)
-------------------------------------------

736.

All complaints for damages resulting from the violation of any of the provisions of Sections 494 or 532 shall either be filed with the commission, or, where concurrent jurisdiction of the cause of action is vested in the courts of this state, in any court of competent jurisdiction within three years from the time the cause of action accrues, and not after. If claim for the asserted damages has been presented in writing to the public utility concerned within the period of three years, the period shall be extended to include six months from the date notice in writing is given by the public utility to the claimant of the disallowance of the claim, or of any part
 or parts thereof specified in the notice.

Whenever the commission institutes an investigation of unauthorized undercharge by any public utility, the institution of the investigation by the commission shall toll the three-year period specified in this section until the commission has rendered its initial decision on the matter. The commission shall render its final decision within two years of the date of the order instituting the investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1004, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

737.

All complaints for the collection of the lawful tariff charges or any part thereof, of public utilities may be filed in any court of competent jurisdiction within three years from the time the cause of action accrues, and not after, but if a public utility presents its claim or demand in writing to the person from whom the tariff charges, or any part thereof, are alleged to be due within such period of three years, that period shall be extended to include six months from the date notice in writing is given to the public utility, by such person, or refusal to pay the demand, or any part or parts thereof specified in the notice of refusal.

If suit for the collection of the lawful tariff charges or any portion thereof of a public utility is filed in any court in accordance with the terms of this section, or if such collection is made by the public utility without filing suit, the person against whom such suit is filed or from whom such collection is made may, within 90 days from the date of service of summons in the suit, or the date of the collection, file with the commission, or with any court of competent jurisdiction, a complaint for damages resulting from the violation of any of the provisions of this part with respect to the transaction to which the suit of the public utility relates, or for which such collection has been made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

737.3.

(a) (1) A highway carrier, as defined by subdivision (c), a freight forwarder, a party representing a carrier or freight forwarder, or an assignee of a carrier or freight forwarder shall not, based on a filed tariff or a filed contract, collect or attempt to collect any additional charge in excess of the charge originally billed by the carrier or freight forwarder for transportation service previously provided subject to the jurisdiction of the commission, except where there are mistakes in billing that are acknowledged by
 both parties or that are the result of intentional misrepresentation by the shipper.

(2) Similarly, the person or entity against whom a claim has been made under the circumstances described in paragraph (1) shall not be liable for additional amounts based on a filed tariff or a filed contract, except where there are mistakes in billing acknowledged by both parties or that are the result of intentional misrepresentation by the shipper.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the term “claimant” shall mean the carrier or freight forwarder, or its assignee or representative making a claim for the collection of rates and charges in addition to those originally billed and collected for the transportation.

(c) “Highway carrier” or “carrier” means every corporation or person, their lessees, trustees, receivers or trustees
 appointed by any court whatsoever, engaged in transportation of property for compensation or hire as a business over any public highway in this state by means of a motor vehicle, except that “highway carrier” does not include:

(1) Any farmer resident of this state who occasionally transports from the place of production to a warehouse, regular market, place of storage, or place of shipment the farm products of neighboring farmers in exchange for like services or for a cash consideration or farm products for compensation.

(2) Persons or corporations hauling their own property.

(3) Any farmer operating a motor vehicle used exclusively in the transportation of his or her livestock and agricultural commodities or in the transportation of supplies to his or her farm.

(4) Any nonprofit agricultural cooperative association organized and acting within the scope of its powers under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20 of the Agricultural Code to the extent only that it is engaged in transporting its own property or the property of its members.

(5) Any person exclusively transporting United States mail pursuant to a contract with the United States government.

(6) Any integrated intermodal small package carrier which is registered subject to Chapter 2.7 (commencing with Section 4120).

(7) Any household goods carrier, as defined in Section 5109.

(d) For purposes of this section, “mistakes in billing” include, but are not limited to, matters such as clerical errors, billing for
 transportation of a different commodity than the commodity actually shipped, and billing for transportation of a smaller amount of the commodity than the amount actually shipped.

(e) This section shall apply to all claims arising from transportation performed (in whole or in part) before January 1, 1995, including all lawsuits or claims pending on the effective date of this section.

(f) If any claim that qualifies under this section was settled by mutual agreement of the parties to the claim, or resolved by a final adjudication of a federal or state court, before the effective date of this section, the settlement or adjudication shall be treated as binding, enforceable, and not contrary to law, unless the settlement was agreed to as a result of fraud or coercion.

(g) If the claimant has filed, on or before the
 effective date of this section, a suit for the collection of additional freight charges, the claimant shall notify the person, or entity, from whom additional freight charges are sought of the provisions of this section within 30 days of the effective date of this section.

(h) If, on or before the effective date of this section, the claimant has demanded the payment of additional freight charges and has not filed a suit for the collection of additional freight charges, the claimant shall notify the person, or entity, from whom additional freight charges are sought of the provisions of this section within 30 days of the effective date of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 72, Sec. 3.   Effective June 21, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

738.

For the purpose of Sections 734 to 737, inclusive, the cause of action shall accrue upon the delivery or tender of delivery of the shipment or the performance of the service or the furnishing of the commodity or product with respect to which complaint is filed or claim made. The remedies in those sections shall be cumulative and in addition to any other remedy or remedies in this part provided in case of failure of a public utility to obey an order or decision of the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

738.6.

In establishing rates for a public utility operating any portion of its line, plant, or system within a federally designated nonattainment area, the commission shall determine which expenses related to compliance with state and local air pollution control requirements for using clean-burning fuels in that area are reasonable and necessary and shall approve those expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1546, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

739.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Baseline quantity” means a quantity of electricity or gas allocated by the commission for residential customers based on from 50 to 60 percent of average residential consumption of these commodities, except that, for residential gas customers and for all-electric residential customers, the baseline quantity shall be established at from 60 to 70 percent of average residential consumption during the winter heating season. In establishing the baseline quantities, the commission shall take into account climatic and seasonal variations in consumption and the availability of gas service. The commission shall review and revise baseline quantities as average consumption patterns change in order to maintain these ratios and may do so during
 the rate case or other ratesetting proceeding of a gas corporation or electrical corporation. The commission shall make efforts to minimize bill volatility for residential customers, including all-electric residential customers. Those efforts may include modifying the length of the baseline seasons or defining additional baseline seasons.

(2) “Residential customer” means those customers receiving electrical or gas service pursuant to a domestic rate schedule and excludes industrial, commercial, and every other category of customer.

(b) The commission shall designate a baseline quantity of gas and electricity which is necessary to supply a significant portion of the reasonable energy needs of the average residential customer. In estimating those quantities, the commission shall take into account differentials in energy needs between customers whose residential energy needs are
 currently supplied by electricity alone or by both electricity and gas. The commission shall develop a separate baseline quantity for all-electric residential customers. For these purposes, “all-electric residential customers” are residential customers having electrical service only or whose space heating is provided by electricity, or both. The commission shall also take into account differentials in energy use by climatic zone and season.

(c) (1) The commission shall establish a standard limited allowance which shall be in addition to the baseline quantity of gas and electricity for residential customers dependent on life-support equipment, including, but not limited to, emphysema and pulmonary patients. A residential customer dependent on life-support equipment shall be allocated a higher energy allocation than the average residential customer.

(2) “Life-support equipment” means that equipment which utilizes mechanical or artificial means to sustain, restore, or supplant a vital function, or mechanical equipment which is relied upon for mobility both within and outside of buildings. “Life-support equipment,” as used in this subdivision, includes all of the following: all types of respirators, iron lungs, hemodialysis machines, suction machines, electric nerve stimulators, pressure pads and pumps, aerosol tents, electrostatic and ultrasonic nebulizers, compressors, IPPB machines, and motorized wheelchairs.

(3) The limited allowance specified in this subdivision shall also be made available to paraplegic and quadriplegic persons in consideration of the increased heating and cooling needs of those persons.

(4) The limited allowance specified in this subdivision shall also be made available to multiple sclerosis
 patients in consideration of the increased heating and cooling needs of those persons.

(5) The limited allowance specified in this subdivision shall also be made available to scleroderma patients in consideration of the increased heating needs of those persons.

(6) The limited allowance specified in this subdivision shall also be made available to persons who are being treated for a life-threatening illness or have a compromised immune system, if a licensed physician and surgeon, a physician assistant practicing within his or her scope of practice in compliance with the Physician Assistant Practice Act (Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code), or a person licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act certifies in writing to the utility that the additional energy, heating, or cooling allowance, or both, is medically
 necessary to sustain the life of the person or prevent deterioration of the person’s medical condition.

(d) (1) The commission shall require that every electrical and gas corporation file a schedule of rates and charges providing baseline rates. The baseline rates shall apply to the first or lowest block of an increasing block rate structure which shall be the baseline quantity. In establishing these rates, the commission shall avoid excessive rate increases for residential customers, and shall establish an appropriate gradual differential between the rates for the respective blocks of usage.

(2) In establishing residential electric and gas rates, including baseline rates, the commission shall ensure that the rates are sufficient to enable the electrical corporation or gas corporation to recover a just and reasonable amount of revenue from residential
 customers as a class, while observing the principle that electricity and gas services are necessities, for which a low affordable rate is desirable and while observing the principle that conservation is desirable in order to maintain an affordable bill.

(3) At least until December 31, 2003, the commission shall require that all charges for residential electric customers are volumetric, and shall prohibit any electrical corporation from imposing any charges on residential consumption that are independent of consumption, unless those charges are in place prior to April 12, 2001.

(e) (1) Each electrical corporation and each gas corporation shall, in a timeframe consistent with each electrical and gas corporation’s next general rate case, disclose on the billing statement of a residential customer all of the following:

(A) Cost per kilowatthour or gas therm per tier.

(B) Allocation of kilowatthour or gas therm per tier.

(C) Visual representation of usage and cost per tier.

(D) Usage comparison with prior periods.

(E) Itemized cost components in the bill to identify state and local taxes.

(F) Identification of delivery, generation, public purpose, and other charges.

(G) Contact information for the commission’s Consumer Affairs Branch.

(2) An electrical corporation and a gas corporation shall make available online to
 residential customers both of the following:

(A) Examples of how conservation measures, including changing thermostat settings and turning off unused lights, could reduce energy usage and costs.

(B) Examples of how energy-saving devices and weatherization measures could reduce energy usage and costs.

(3) The commission may modify, adjust, or add to the requirements of this subdivision as the individual circumstances of each electrical corporation or gas corporation merits, or for master-meter customers, as individual circumstances merit.

(4) The commission shall, as part of the general rate case of an electrical corporation or gas corporation, assess opportunities to improve the quality of information contained in the utility’s periodic billings.

(f) Wholesale electrical or gas purchases, and the rates charged therefor, are exempt from this section.

(g) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit experimentation with alternative gas or electrical rate schedules for the purpose of achieving energy conservation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 518, Sec. 1.   (SB 1338)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

739.1.

(a) The commission shall continue a program of assistance to low-income electricity and gas customers with annual household incomes that are no greater than 200 percent of the federal poverty guideline levels, the cost of which shall not be borne solely by any single class of customer. For one-person households, program eligibility shall be based on two-person household guideline levels. The program shall be referred to as the California Alternate Rates for Energy or CARE program. The commission shall ensure that the level of discount for low-income
 electricity and gas customers correctly reflects the level of need.

(b) The commission shall establish rates for CARE program participants, subject to both of the following:

(1) That the commission ensure that low-income ratepayers are not jeopardized or overburdened by monthly energy expenditures, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 382.

(2) That the level of the discount for low-income electricity and gas ratepayers correctly reflects the level of need as determined by the needs assessment conducted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 382.

(c) In establishing CARE program discounts for an electrical corporation with 100,000 or more customer
 accounts in California, the commission shall ensure all of the following:

(1) The average effective CARE program discount shall not be less than 30 percent or more than 35 percent of the revenues that would have been produced for the same billed usage by non-CARE program customers. The average effective discount determined by the commission shall not reflect any charges for which CARE program customers are exempted, discounts to fixed charges or other rates paid by non-CARE program customers, or bill savings resulting from participation in other programs, including the medical baseline allowance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 739. The average effective CARE program discount shall be calculated as a weighted average of the CARE program discounts provided to individual customers.

(2) If an electrical corporation provides an average effective CARE program discount in excess of the maximum percentage specified in paragraph (1), the electrical corporation shall not reduce, on an annual basis, the average effective CARE program discount by more than a reasonable percentage decrease below the discount in effect on January 1, 2013, or that the electrical corporation had been authorized to place in effect by that date.

(3) The entire CARE program discount shall be provided in the form of a reduction in the overall bill for the eligible CARE program customer.

(d) The commission shall work with electrical and gas corporations to establish penetration goals. The commission shall authorize recovery of all administrative costs associated with the implementation
 of the CARE program that the commission determines to be reasonable, through a balancing account mechanism. Administrative costs shall include, but are not limited to, outreach, marketing, regulatory compliance, certification and verification, billing, measurement and evaluation, and capital improvements and upgrades to communications and processing equipment.

(e) The commission shall examine methods to improve CARE